ja: コインの打刻または仕上げ: バーニッシュ / 未流通; ビジネスストライク; エンハンスト未流通; マットプルーフ; プルーフ; リバースプルーフ; スペシメン; その他
zh-CN: 硬币版别或表面处理: 抛光/未流通; 普制; 强化未流通; 哑光精制; 精制; 反向精制; 样币; 其他
el: Τύπος κοπής ή φινιρίσματος νομίσματος: Γυαλισμένο (burnished) / ακυκλοφόρητο; Κανονικής κυκλοφορίας; Βελτιωμένο ακυκλοφόρητο; Ματ δοκίμιο; Δοκίμιο; Αντίστροφο δοκίμιο; Δείγμα; Άλλο
en: Coin strike or finish: Burnished / uncirculated; Business strike; Enhanced uncirculated; Matte proof; Proof; Reverse proof; Specimen; Other
fi: Kolikon lyönti tai viimeistely: Burnished / kiertämätön; Käyttöraha; Enhanced uncirculated; Matta proof; Proof; Käänteinen proof; Näyteraha; Muu
de: Münzprägung oder Oberflächenfinish: Mattiert / Stempelglanz; Normalprägung; Erweiterter Stempelglanz; Mattierte Polierte Platte; Polierte Platte (PP); Invertierte Polierte Platte; Spiegelglanz; Andere
pt-BR: Cunhagem ou acabamento da moeda: Polida / não circulada; Cunhagem normal; Não circulada aprimorada; Proof fosco; Proof; Proof reverso; Espécime; Outros
cs: Ražba mince nebo povrchová úprava: Leštěná/neobíhající; Běžná ražba; Vylepšená neobíhající; Matný proof; Proof; Obrácený proof (reverse proof); Vzorek (specimen); Jiná
nl: Munt slag of afwerking: Gepolijst / ongecirculeerd; Business strike; Enhanced uncirculated; Matte proof; Proof; Reverse proof; Specimen; Overig
pl: Typ bicia lub wykończenie monety: Oksydowana (burnished) / mennicza; Obiegowa (business strike); Ulepszona mennicza (enhanced uncirculated); Matowa lustrzanka (matte proof); Lustrzanka (proof); Odwrotna lustrzanka (reverse proof); Okaz (specimen); Inne
hu: Érmeverés vagy befejezés: Fényesített / verdefényes; Forgalmi veret; Javított verdefényes; Matt proof; Proof; Reverz proof; Minta; Egyéb
sl-SI: Način kovanja ali površinska obdelava kovancev: Polirano / neobtočno; Navadno kovanje; Izboljšano neobtočno; Mat proof; Proof (polirana plošča); Obrnjeni proof; Primerek; Drugo
vi: Kiểu dập hoặc hoàn thiện tiền xu: Đánh bóng / Chưa lưu hành; Dập tiêu chuẩn; Chưa lưu hành tăng cường; Proof mờ; Proof; Proof ngược; Bản mẫu; Khác
sv: Myntslag eller yta: Polerad/ocirkulerad; Cirkulationsmynt; Förbättrad ocirkulerad; Matt proof; Proof; Omvänd proof; Provmynt; Övrigt
th: ลักษณะการผลิตหรือผิวของเหรียญ: ขัดเงา / ไม่ผ่านการใช้งาน; ผลิตเพื่อใช้งานจริง; ไม่ผ่านการใช้งานแบบพิเศษ; ปรู๊ฟแบบด้าน; ปรู๊ฟ; ปรู๊ฟแบบกลับด้าน; เหรียญตัวอย่าง; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Kovanica ili završetak: Polirano / necirkulirano; Standardni otkov; Poboljšano necirkulirano; Mat proof; Proof; Obrnuti proof; Uzorak (specimen); Ostalo
fr: Frappe ou finition de la pièce: Bruni / non circulé; Frappe courante; Non circulé amélioré; Épreuve mate; Épreuve; Épreuve inversée; Spécimen; Autre
es: Acuñación o acabado de la moneda: Bruñida / sin circular; Acuñación comercial; Sin circular mejorada; Prueba mate; Prueba; Prueba inversa; Espécimen; Otro
tr: Madeni para basım kalitesi: Perdahlanmış / çil; Tedavül baskısı; Geliştirilmiş çil; Mat proof; Proof; Ters proof; Örnek; Diğer
bg-BG: Щампа или финиш на монетата: Полирана / нециркулирала; За обращение; Подобрена нециркулирала; Матов Proof; Proof; Reverse proof; Образец; Други
zh-TW: 硬幣鑄打或表面處理: 拋光 / 未流通; 流通幣; 強化未流通幣; 霧面精鑄; 精鑄; 逆向精鑄; 樣幣; 其他
sk-SK: Spôsob razby alebo povrchová úprava mince: Leštená / neobehová; Bežná razba; Vylepšená neobehová; Matná proof; Proof; Reverzná proof; Vzorový kus; Iné
lt-LT: Monetos kaldinimo arba apdailos tipas: Poliruota / nebuvusi apyvartoje; Įprasto kaldinimo (apyvartinė); Pagerinta nebuvusi apyvartoje; Matinė „Proof“; Kolekcinė („Proof“); Atvirkštinė „Proof“; Pavyzdinė („Specimen“); Kita
it: conio o finitura della moneta: Brunita/non circolata; Conio standard; Fior di conio migliorata; Fondo specchio opaco; Fondo specchio (Proof); Proof inverso; Specimen; Altro
ko: 동전 주조 방식 또는 마감: 버니시 / 미유통; 비즈니스 스트라이크; 인핸스드 미유통; 매트 프루프; 프루프; 리버스 프루프; 견본(Specimen); 기타
pt-PT: Cunhagem ou acabamento da moeda: Polida/não circulada; Cunhagem normal; Não circulada melhorada; Prova mate; Prova; Prova reversa; Espécime; Outro
nb: Myntslag eller -avslutning: Polert / usirkulert; Sirkulasjonsmynt; Forbedret usirkulert; Matt proof; Proof; Omvendt proof; Prøvemynt; Annet
ru: Тип чеканки или отделки монеты: Полированная / Анциркулейтед (Uncirculated); Обычный чекан (Business strike); Улучшенный Анциркулейтед; Матовый пруф; Пруф (Proof); Обратный пруф; Образец (Specimen); Другое
da: Møntprægning eller finish: Pudsede/ucirkulerede; Cirkulationsmønter; Forbedret ucirkuleret; Mat proof; Proof; Omvendt proof; Prøvemønt; Andet
ro-RO: Turnarea sau finisarea monedei: Lustruită / necirculată; Emisiune de circulație (Business strike); Necirculată îmbunătățită; Mată Proof; Proof; Reverse Proof; Specimen; Altele